Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.88.020

Wharves and landings.

A code city shall have and exercise all powers granted by general laws to cities and towns of any class relative to docks and other appurtenances to harbor and shipping, including but not limited to, the provisions of RCW 35.22.280, 35.23.440, * 35.24.290, and 88.24.030.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.88.020.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 35.24.290 was repealed by 1994 c 81 s 89.